Utah statutes.
17-8-2.   Maintenance of project -- Acquisition of property.
A county may contract to maintain such flood control projects after the
construction work is completed, which maintenance may be without expense to
the United States of America, and may contract to and acquire easements and
rights of way to relocate public roads or bridges when the replacement shall
be rendered necessary by the construction of any flood control project and may
give satisfactory assurance to the United States of America, or any agency
thereof, that the location, relocation, building or rebuilding of such roads,
rights of way, or bridges shall be done without expense to the United States
of America or any agency thereof.
